dictsource/ba_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Bashkir

.group а
        а        A

.group ә
        ә        &

.group б
        б        b

.group в
        в        w   // [v] in Russian words

.group г
        г        g  // changes to [Q] or [Q"]

.group ғ
        ғ        Q"

.group д
        д        d

.group ҙ
        ҙ        D

.group е
     _) е        je2  // changes to [je] or [jV]
        е        e

.group ё
        ё        jo

.group ж
        ж        Z

.group җ
        җ        Z;

.group з
        з        z

.group и
        и        i
     A) и        j

.group й
        й        j
     K) й (K     I   // not next to a vowel

.group к
        к        k

.group ҡ
        ҡ        q

.group л
        л        l

.group м
        м        m

.group н
        н        n
//        н (к     N
        н (г     N
        н (х     N

.group ң
        ң        N

.group о
        о        o

.group ө
        ө        W

.group п
        п        p

.group р
        р        r

.group с
        с        s

.group ҫ
        ҫ        T

.group т
        т        t

.group у
        у        u   // or w
     A) у        w

.group ү
        ү        y   // or w
     A) ү        w

.group ф
        ф        f

.group х
        х        x

.group һ
        һ        h

.group ц
        ц        ts

.group ч
        ч        S;

.group ш
        ш        S

.group щ
        щ        SS;

.group ъ
        ъ        ?

.group ы
        ы        V
        ый       Vj   // need a diphthong phoneme ??

.group ь
        ь        ?

.group э
        э        e

.group ю
        ю        ju2   // changes to ju or jy

.group я
        я        ja   // changes to jA or j&

.group
        $        dolAR
